Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-503
Year-round operation of public schools; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to promote increased efficiency in the utilization of public schoolhouses and other school facilities by providing for a program of year-round operation of the public schools of this state. The Legislature finds that the cost of education is substantially increased when schoolhouses sit idle for three months of the year and that the rural and pioneer conditions which dictated summer closing of public schools no longer prevail in many of the school districts of the state.

Laws 1973, LB 65, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-201.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 256.